Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3209
License; renewal; term; renewal fee; renewal application.

Each license issued or renewed by the secretary shall expire on June 30 of the first even-numbered year following its issuance and may be renewed by the secretary upon the payment by the licensee, not later than the expiration date, of the license renewal fee established pursuant to section 71-3204 and upon the submission by such licensee of such a license renewal application as the secretary may prescribe as reasonably necessary to ascertain such licensee's continued compliance with the provisions of sections 71-3201 to 71-3213.

Laws 1959, c. 329, § 9, p. 1199;

Laws 1965, c. 426, § 2, p. 1364;

Laws 1982, LB 928, § 55;

Laws 2002, Second Spec. Sess., LB 25, § 3.